tests/morphophonology/pending/optative-1p.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-lookup
    Gen:  ../../../tat.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  ../../../tat.automorf.hfst

Tests: 

  "[twol] optative":

    яз<v><tv><opt><p1><sg> : языйм
    яз<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : языйк
    яз<v><tv><neg><opt><p1><sg> : язмыйм
    яз<v><tv><neg><opt><p1><pl> : язмыйк

    кил<v><iv><opt><p1><sg> : килим
    кил<v><iv><opt><p1><pl> : килик
    кил<v><iv><neg><opt><p1><sg> : килмим
    кил<v><iv><neg><opt><p1><pl> : килмик

    кара<v><tv><opt><p1><sg> : карыйм
    кара<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : карыйк
    кара<v><tv><neg><opt><p1><sg> : карамыйм
    кара<v><tv><neg><opt><p1><pl> : карамыйк

    бәйлә<v><tv><opt><p1><sg> : бәйлим
    бәйлә<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : бәйлик
    бәйлә<v><tv><neg><opt><p1><sg> : бәйләмим
    бәйлә<v><tv><neg><opt><p1><pl> : бәйләмик
